Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB968.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 59GESTATIONAL CARRIER AGREEMENTSSec.5901. Scope of chapter.5902. Definitions.5903. Background check requirements.5904. Court review and authority.5905. Enforcement and penalties.§ 5901. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to gestational carrier agreements.§ 5902. Definitions.1234567891011121314151617181920 The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Gestational carrier." An adult woman who agrees to carry a pregnancy for intended parents under a gestational carrier agreement."Gestational carrier agreement." A written contract between a gestational carrier and intended parent outlining the rights, responsibilities and expectations of the parties regarding assisted reproduction."Intended parent." An individual who enters into a gestational carrier agreement with the intent to be legally recognized as a parent of the resulting child.§ 5903. Background check requirements.(a) Mandatory checks.--An intended parent, a gestational carrier and all adult household members residing in the homes of the intended parent and gestational carrier shall obtain the following certifications no more than one year prior to entering into a gestational carrier agreement:(1) A Pennsylvania State Police criminal history background check.(2) A Federal Bureau of Investigation fingerprint-based background check.(3) A Pennsylvania Child Abuse History Clearance.(4) A Pennsylvania and national sex offender registry check.(b) Submission and review.--Certifications shall be submitted to the court prior to the issuance of a prebirth or postbirth parentage order.(c) Interstate protections.--20250SB0968PN1108 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) If a gestational carrier or an adult household member resides outside of this Commonwealth, the individual shall, in addition to the requirements of subsections (a) and (b), submit:(i) A criminal history background check from the individual's state of residence.(ii) A child abuse history clearance from the individual's state of residence, if available.(iii) A state sex offender registry check from the individual's state of residence.(2) Background checks and clearances submitted from outside of this Commonwealth shall meet or exceed the requirements of the laws of this Commonwealth as specified in subsections (a) and (b). If the background checks or clearances from the individual's state of residence do not meet or exceed the requirements of this Commonwealth, the individual shall obtain additional certifications as necessary to satisfy the requirements of this Commonwealth.(3) A parentage order issued in this Commonwealth may not be granted until all clearances have been verified by the court.(4) Recognition of valid out-of-State parentage judgments shall be consistent with Article IV, section 1 of the Constitution of the United States, except where recognition would pose a clear and compelling threat to the immediate safety and welfare of the child.(d) International protections.--(1) If a gestational carrier or adult household member resides outside of the United States, the following shall be submitted, in addition to subsections (a) and (b):20250SB0968PN1108 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) Available police clearance from the foreign jurisdiction of residence.(ii) Available foreign child protection clearance or equivalent documentation.(iii) Certification of lawful entry of the child into the United States, including a United States passport, Consular Report of Birth Abroad or other Federal documentation establishing lawful status.(2) Background checks and clearances submitted from outside of the United States shall meet or exceed the requirements of the laws of this Commonwealth as specified in subsections (a) and (b). If the background checks or clearances from the foreign jurisdiction do not meet or exceed the requirements of this Commonwealth, the individual shall obtain additional certifications as necessary to satisfy the requirements of this Commonwealth.(3) A prebirth or postbirth parentage order may not be issued until all clearances have been verified by the court.(4) A prebirth or postbirth parentage order may not be issued for a child born outside of the United States unless:(i) The child has entered the United States lawfully or has an approved visa or citizenship application.(ii) All background checks and foreign clearances required under this section are submitted and verified by the court.(5) The court may require the intended parents to file a sworn statement acknowledging any pending Federal immigration proceedings related to the child's status.§ 5904. Court review and authority.(a) Consideration.--The court shall consider the results of 20250SB0968PN1108 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 all background checks in determining whether to grant a parentage order.(b) Authority.--The court may, after notice and hearing:(1) Deny a petition for parentage based on the presence of disqualifying offenses consistent with section 6344(c) (relating to employees having contact with children; adoptive and foster parents).(2) Impose conditions or require supervision as deemed appropriate to ensure the welfare of the child.(3) Refer matters to child protective services for investigation where appropriate.(c) Interstate and international enforcement.--(1) The court may not issue a prebirth or postbirth parentage order unless:(i) All background checks required under section 5903 (relating to background check requirements), including those for out-of-State and international residents, have been completed and verified.(ii) The court is satisfied that compliance with this chapter ensures the child's placement in a safe and vetted home.(2) Recognition of valid foreign or out-of-State parentage judgments may not be denied except where necessary to prevent a clear and compelling threat to the immediate safety and welfare of the child.(d) Temporary safe placement.--(1) If a child born under a gestational carrier agreement is present in this Commonwealth and the background checks required under section 5903 have not yet been fully verified, the court shall:20250SB0968PN1108 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) place the child in the temporary care of the intended parents under supervised placement conditions; or(ii) if the intended parents or their household members have not completed sex offender registry clearances, require temporary safe placement with:(A) a licensed foster care provider approved by the Department of Human Services; or(B) a preapproved kinship caregiver meeting all background check requirements under section 6344.(2) Temporary safe placement shall remain in effect only until:(i) The intended parents and all required household members have passed all background checks under section 5903.(ii) The court issues a prebirth or postbirth parentage order.(3) Temporary safe placement may not exceed 30 days absent a showing of good cause.(4) During temporary safe placement, the intended parents shall be afforded supervised visitation and care responsibilities as the court deems consistent with the welfare of the child.(5) Nothing in this subsection shall delay issuance of a parentage order once compliance with section 5903 is confirmed.(e) Regulations.--The Department of Human Services shall promulgate regulations necessary to implement temporary safe placement and supervised visitation under this chapter.§ 5905. Enforcement and penalties.20250SB0968PN1108 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Civil penalty.--An individual who knowingly enters into a gestational carrier agreement without complying with the background check requirements of this chapter shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $10,000.(b) Criminal penalty.--Knowingly submitting false or fraudulent documentation in connection with the required certifications under this chapter constitutes a misdemeanor of the third degree under 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities).(c) Administrative enforcement.--The Department of Human Services shall develop procedures for verifying compliance and may conduct random audits of gestational carrier agreements filed in this Commonwealth.(d) Judicial enforcement.--A court may, after notice and hearing:(1) void a gestational carrier agreement; or(2) withhold parentage recognition if background check compliance is not demonstrated.(e) Prosecutorial authority.--The Attorney General or county district attorney may prosecute violations of this section.Section 2. Section 6344(a) of Title 23 is amended by adding a paragraph and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 6344. Employees having contact with children; adoptive and foster parents.(a) Applicability.--Beginning December 31, 2014, this section applies to the following individuals:* * *(9) An intended parent or gestational carrier and all adult household members of an intended parent or gestational 20250SB0968PN1108 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 carrier, in connection with a gestational carrier agreement involving the placement of a child, whether the birth occurs in this Commonwealth, in another state or territory or outside of the United States.* * *(q) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Gestational carrier." As defined in section 5902 (relating to definitions)."Gestational carrier agreement." As defined in section 5902."Intended parent." As defined in section 5902.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250SB0968PN1108 - 8 - 12345678910111213